Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.072

Preservation of declarations of candidacy.

The secretary of state and each county auditor shall preserve all declarations of candidacy filed in their respective offices for six months. All declarations of candidacy must be open to public inspection.

[ 2003 c 111 s 501; 1965 c 9 s 29.27.090. Prior: 1921 c 178 s 1, part; 1915 c 11 s 1, part; 1907 c 130 s 1, part; 1889 p 402 s 7, part; Code 1881 s 3067, part; 1865 p 30 s 1, part; RRS s 5171, part. Formerly RCW 29A.20.010, 29.27.090.]